Utah statutes.
11-13-312.   Exemption from privilege tax.
Title 59, Chapter 4, Privilege Tax, does not apply to a project, or any part
of it, or to facilities providing additional project capacity, or any part of
them, or to the possession or other beneficial use of a project or facilities
providing additional project capacity as long as there is a requirement to
make impact alleviation payments, fees in lieu of ad valorem property taxes,
or ad valorem property taxes, with respect to the project or facilities
providing additional project capacity pursuant to this chapter.
